Washington statutes.
RCW 41.12.910

Repeal.

All acts and parts of acts in conflict with the provisions of this chapter are hereby repealed insofar as they conflict with the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1937 c 13 s 26; RRS s 9558a-26.]